California statutes. Vehicle Code
(2) Notwithstanding Section 12801.5 and commencing no later than July 1, 2027, the department shall issue an identification card to a person who is unable to submit satisfactory proof that the applicant’s presence in the United States is authorized under federal law if
 the person provides satisfactory proof to the department of the person’s identity and California residency.

(b) The department shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, procedures for (1) identifying documents acceptable for the purposes of proving identity and California residency, (2) procedures for verifying the authenticity of the documents, (3) issuance of a temporary license pending verification of any document’s authenticity, and (4) hearings to appeal a denial of a license or temporary license, or identification card.

(c) Regulations adopted for purposes of establishing the documents acceptable to prove identity and residency pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be promulgated by the department in consultation with
 appropriate interested parties, in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including law enforcement representatives, immigrant rights representatives, labor representatives, and other stakeholders, which may include, but are not limited to, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the California State Sheriffs’ Association, and the California Police Chiefs Association. The department shall accept various types of documentation for this purpose, including, but not limited to, the following documents:

(1) A valid, unexpired consular identification document issued by a consulate from the applicant’s country of citizenship, or a valid, unexpired passport from the applicant’s country of citizenship.

(2) An original birth certificate, or other proof of age, as designated by the department.

(3) A home utility bill, lease or rental agreement, or other proof of California residence, as designated by the department.

(4) The following documents, which, if in a language other than English, shall be accompanied by a certified translation or an affidavit of translation into English:

(A) A marriage license or divorce certificate.

(B) A foreign federal electoral photo card issued on or after January 1, 1991.

(C) A foreign driver’s license.

(5) A United States Department of Homeland Security Form I-589, Application for Asylum and for Withholding of Removal.

(6) An official school or college transcript that includes the applicant’s date of birth or a foreign school record that is sealed and includes a photograph of the applicant at the age the record was issued.

(7) A United States Department of Homeland Security Form I-20 or Form DS-2019.

(8) A deed or title to real property.

(9) A property tax bill or statement issued within the previous 12 months.

(10) An income tax
 return.

(d) (1) (A) A license issued pursuant to this section shall bear the following notice: “This card is not acceptable for official federal purposes. This license is issued only as a license to drive a motor vehicle. It does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.”

(B) An identification card issued pursuant to this section shall bear the following notice: “This card is not acceptable for official federal purposes. This identification card is issued only as a means of identification. It does not establish eligibility for employment, voter registration, or public benefits.”

(2) The notice described in paragraph (1) shall be in lieu of the notice
 provided in Section 12800.5.

(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall become inoperative upon the department’s next scheduled revision of the driver’s license or identification card on or after January 1, 2023, at which time, a driver’s license and identification card issued pursuant to this section shall bear the notice described in Section 12800.5 or
 13005.5, respectively, as added by the act that added this paragraph.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 40300 or any other law, a peace officer shall not detain or arrest a person solely on the belief that the person is an unlicensed driver, unless the officer has reasonable cause to believe the person driving is under 16 years of age.

(f) The inability to obtain a driver’s license pursuant to this section does not abrogate or diminish in any respect the legal requirement of every driver in this state to obey the motor vehicle laws of this state, including laws with respect to licensing, motor vehicle registration, and financial responsibility.

(g) It is a violation of law to discriminate against a person because the
 person holds or presents a license or identification card issued under this section, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) It is a violation of the Unruh Civil Rights Act (Section 51 of the Civil Code), for a business establishment to discriminate against a person because the person holds or presents a license or identification card issued under this section.

(2) (A) It is a violation of the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) for an employer or other covered person or entity, pursuant to Section 12940 of the Government Code and subdivision (v) of Section 12926 of the Government Code, to discriminate against a person because the person holds or
 presents a driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to this section, or for an employer or other covered entity to require a person to present a driver’s license, unless possessing a driver’s license is required by law or is required by the employer and the employer’s requirement is otherwise permitted by law. This section shall not be construed to limit or expand an employer’s authority to require a person to possess a driver’s license.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), this section shall not be construed to alter an employer’s rights or obligations under Section 1324a of Title 8 of the United States Code regarding obtaining documentation evidencing identity and authorization for employment. An action taken by an employer that is required by the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a) is not a
 violation of law.

(3) It is a violation of Section 11135 of the Government Code for a state or local governmental authority, agent, or person acting on behalf of a state or local governmental authority, or a program
 or activity that is funded directly or receives financial assistance from the state, to discriminate against an individual because the individual holds or presents a license or identification card issued pursuant to this section, including by notifying a law enforcement agency of the individual’s identity or that the individual carries a license or identification card issued under this section if a notification is not required by law or would not have been provided if the individual held a license issued pursuant to Section 12801 or an identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000.

(h) Driver’s license or identification card information obtained by an employer shall be treated as private and confidential, is exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of
 Title 1 of the Government Code), and shall not be disclosed to any unauthorized person or used for any purpose other than to establish identity and authorization to drive, as applicable.

(i) Information collected pursuant to this section is not a public record and shall not be disclosed by the department, except as required by law.

(j) Documents provided by applicants to prove identity or residency pursuant to this section are not public records and shall not be disclosed except in response to a subpoena for individual records in a criminal proceeding or a court order, or in response to a law enforcement request to address an urgent health or safety need if the law enforcement agency certifies in writing the specific circumstances that do not permit authorities time to obtain a court
 order. Immigration enforcement, as defined in Section 7284.4 of the Government Code, does not constitute an urgent health and safety need for purposes of this subdivision.

(k) A license or identification card issued pursuant to this section shall not be used as evidence of an individual’s citizenship or immigration status for any purpose.

(l) In addition to the fees required by Section 14902, a person applying for an identification card pursuant to this section may be required to pay an additional fee determined by the department that is sufficient to offset the reasonable administrative costs of implementing the provisions of the act that authorized the issuance of identification cards pursuant to this section. If this additional fee is assessed, it shall only apply
 until June 30, 2030.

(m) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 25.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (m).)
-------------------------------------------

12801.10.

(a) Nothing in Section 1653.5, 12800, 12801, 12801.5, or 12801.9 authorizes an individual to apply for, or be issued, a commercial driver’s license without the submission of his or her social security account number upon application.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015, or on the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 12801.11, whichever is sooner.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 524, Sec. 16.   (AB 60)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, or sooner, as provided in subd. (m).   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (n).)
-------------------------------------------

12801.11.

(a) If the director determines that the department is prepared to begin issuing driver’s licenses pursuant to Section 12801.9 on a date sooner than January 1, 2015, the director shall execute a declaration stating that determination and date and, within five business days, provide a copy of that declaration to
 the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and to the Governor, and shall post this information on its Internet Web site.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 524, Sec. 17.   (AB 60)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12802.

Every original application shall be signed and verified by the applicant under penalty of perjury and the applicant shall submit such evidence of age as the department may require, and, if the applicant is a minor, the application shall also be signed and verified as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 254, Sec. 5.   (AB 174)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12802.5.

Before issuing a driver’s license or permit to any person under 21 years of age, both of the following shall occur:

(a) The department shall inform the applicant of the following:

(1) It is unlawful to drive with a blood-alcohol concentration of 0.01 percent or greater, as measured by a preliminary alcohol screening test or other chemical test.

(2) The penalty for so driving is a one-year suspension of the driving privilege.

(3) A refusal to take, or a failure to complete, a preliminary alcohol screening test or other chemical test for the purpose of determining the level of alcohol pursuant to Section 13388 shall result in a one-year suspension of the driving privilege.

(4) The fee for reissuance of a driver’s license after suspension for a violation of Section 23136 is one hundred dollars ($100). This fee is in addition to any other fees that may be imposed by the department in connection with reissuance of a driver’s license.

(b) The applicant shall sign a statement that acknowledges that he or she has been notified of the information specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 22, Sec. 7.   Effective May 26, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

12803.

Upon application for an original license, except student licenses, the department shall require an examination of the applicant and shall make provision therefor before an officer or employee or authorized representative of the department in the county wherein the applicant resides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 15275, a person issued a driver’s license by the department is exempt from the endorsement requirements of Section 15275 if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The person is employed in an agricultural operation and is driving a vehicle, other than a vehicle used in common or contract motor carriage, controlled by a farmer and transporting agricultural products or farm machinery or supplies to or from a farm.

(2) (A) The person has fulfilled the applicable training requirements of Subpart H of Part 172 of Title 49 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations.

(B) Upon successful completion of the training required by subparagraph (A), a record of current training, meeting the requirements prescribed by Section 172.704(d) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and a completed application shall be forwarded to the Department of the California Highway Patrol. Upon receipt and validation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall issue a verification of training, valid for three years, which shall be carried by the person when operating an implement of husbandry or a motor vehicle required to display placards pursuant to Section 27903. Within 15 days of issuance by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a copy of the verification shall be forwarded by the person completing the training to the department for inclusion on the
 permanent driving record of the person, together with a fee of twelve dollars ($12).

(C) The department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall develop a suitable form for verification of training.

(3) The person has, within the vehicle, informational material approved by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, in both English and Spanish, outlining basic safety procedures to be followed in the event of an accident. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall provide the information required by this subdivision and make it available at no cost to the person.

(4) The person is operating a vehicle which is an implement of husbandry or a motor vehicle requiring only a
 class C driver’s license and the distance which the vehicle is being operated between the final point of distribution and the ultimate point of application or from part of a farm to another part thereof, or from one farm to another, is not more than 50 miles.

(5) In lieu of a report of a medical examination required by Section 12804.9, an applicant for a certificate pursuant to paragraph (3) shall, upon application and every two years thereafter, submit medical information on a form approved by the department. A person who obtains a verification of training pursuant to this section, but does not meet the medical requirements for a hazardous materials endorsement established by the department under Section 12804.9, is not qualified to transport hazardous materials.

(6) For purposes
 of the penalties and sanctions prescribed by Article 7 (commencing with Section 15300) of Chapter 7, the operation of a vehicle pursuant to this subdivision is deemed to be the operation of a commercial motor vehicle.

(b) Implementation dates for this section may be established by the Department of Motor Vehicles by regulation in order to accomplish an orderly certification program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 397, Sec. 3.   (SB 810)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.5.

The class of vehicles permitted to be operated as shown on a driver’s license held by a minor shall not be changed, unless the parents, guardians, or person having custody of such minor gives written consent to the department for such a change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.6.

(a) A person shall not operate a transit bus transporting passengers unless that person has received from the department a certificate to operate a transit bus or is certified to drive a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus pursuant to Section 12517.

(b) All transit busdrivers shall comply with standards established in Section 40083 of the Education Code. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall establish an
 implementation program for transit busdrivers to meet these requirements. A transit busdriver who was employed as a busdriver on or before July 1, 1990, shall comply with Section 40085.5 of the Education Code instead of Section 40083 of that code in order to receive his or her original certificate.

(c) Implementation procedures for the issuance of transit busdrivers’ certificates may be established by the Department of Motor Vehicles as necessary to implement an orderly transit busdriver training program.

(d) The department shall issue a transit busdriver certificate to a person who provides either of the following:

(1) Proof that he or she has complied with Section 40083 of the Education Code.

(2) Proof that he or she has complied with Section 40085.5
 of the Education Code.

(e) The department may charge a fee of ten dollars ($10) to an applicant for an original or a duplicate or renewal certificate under this section.

(f) The department shall issue a certificate to the applicant. The status of the certificate shall also become part of the pull notice and periodic reports issued pursuant to Section 1808.1. The certificate or the pull notice or periodic reports shall become part of, the person’s employee records for the purpose of inspection pursuant to Sections 1808.1 and 34501. It shall be unlawful for the employer to permit a person to drive a transit bus who does not have a valid certificate.

(g) The term of a certificate shall be a period not to exceed five years, and shall expire with the driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.7.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 12804.9, class C also includes any two-axle motortruck or implement of husbandry weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing an implement of husbandry as specified in subdivision (n) of Section 36005, except that those vehicles shall not be operated in excess of 25 miles per hour on the highways and for not more than 25 miles on the highway from their point of origin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 272, Sec. 25.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may conduct studies to develop and identify examinations and tests, to more accurately identify persons who, due to physical or mental factors, or both, are not competent or qualified to safely operate a motor vehicle.

(b) In addition to any other tests or examinations required under this code, the department may require any person applying for an original
 driver’s license or renewal of a driver’s license, or any person subject to reexamination under Section 13801, to submit to one or more tests or examinations which are part of a study.

(c) The results and information obtained during the study, through the tests and examinations specified in subdivision (a), shall be used only to assess and evaluate the effectiveness of the tests and examinations and to select tests and examinations for use by the department, and for no other purpose. The results of the tests are confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person.

(d) No public entity or employee shall be liable for any loss, detriment, or injury resulting directly or indirectly from the department’s acts or failure to act on information received through the studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.9.

(a) (1) The examination shall include all of the following:

(A) A test of the applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the provisions of this code governing the operation of vehicles upon the highways.

(B) A test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand simple English used in highway traffic and directional signs.

(C) A test of the applicant’s understanding of traffic signs and signals, including the bikeway signs, markers, and traffic control devices established by the Department of Transportation.

(D) An actual demonstration of the
 applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in operating a motor vehicle by driving it under the supervision of an examining officer. The applicant shall submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive, except that the department may waive the driving test part of the examination for any applicant who submits a license issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico if the department verifies through any acknowledged national driver record data source that there are no stops, holds, or other impediments to its issuance. The examining officer may request to see evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle before supervising the demonstration of the applicant’s ability to operate the vehicle. The examining officer may refuse to examine an applicant who is unable to provide proof of financial responsibility for the
 vehicle, unless proof of financial responsibility is not required by this code.

(E) A test of the hearing and eyesight of the applicant, and of other matters that may be necessary to determine the mental and physical fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways, and whether any grounds exist for refusal of a license under this code.

(2) (A) Before a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, may be issued or renewed, the applicant shall have in the applicant’s driver record a valid report of a medical examination of the applicant given not more than two years before the date of the application by a health care professional. As used in this paragraph, “health care professional” means a person who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with applicable state laws and
 regulations to practice medicine and perform physical examinations in the United States. Health care professionals are doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, physician assistants, and registered advanced practice nurses, or doctors of chiropractic who are clinically competent to perform the medical examination presently required of motor carrier drivers by the United States Department of Transportation. The report shall be on a form approved by the department. In establishing the requirements, consideration may be given to the standards presently required of motor carrier drivers by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.

(B) The department may accept a federal waiver of one or more physical qualification standards if the waiver is accompanied by a report of a nonqualifying medical examination for a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, pursuant to Section 391.41(a)(3)(ii)
 of Subpart E of Part 391 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A physical defect of the applicant that, in the opinion of the department, is compensated for to ensure safe driving ability, shall not prevent the issuance of a license to the applicant.

(b) In accordance with the following classifications, an applicant for a driver’s license shall be required to submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive:

(1) Class A includes the following:

(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a combination of vehicles, if a vehicle being towed has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.

(B) A vehicle towing more than one vehicle.

(C) A trailer bus.

(D) The operation of all vehicles under class B and class C.

(2) Class B includes the following:

(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds.

(B) A single vehicle with three or more axles, except any three-axle vehicle weighing less than 6,000 pounds.

(C) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds, except a trailer bus.

(D) A farm labor vehicle.

(E) A single vehicle with three or more axles or a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.

(F) A house car over 40 feet in length, excluding safety devices and safety bumpers.

(G) The operation of all vehicles covered under class C.

(3) Class C includes the following:

(A) A two-axle vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, including when the vehicle is towing a trailer or semitrailer with a gross vehicle
 weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a trailer coach not exceeding 9,000 pounds gross.

(C) A house car of 40 feet in length or less.

(D) A three-axle vehicle weighing 6,000 pounds gross or less.

(E) A house car of 40 feet in length or less or a vehicle towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less, including when a tow dolly is used. A person driving a vehicle may not tow another vehicle in violation of Section 21715.

(F) (i) A two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing either
 a trailer coach or a fifth-wheel travel trailer not exceeding 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation.

(ii) A two-axle vehicle weighing 4,000 pounds or more unladen when towing a fifth-wheel travel trailer exceeding 10,000 pounds, but not exceeding 15,000 pounds, gross vehicle weight rating, when the towing of the trailer is not for compensation, and if the person has passed a specialized written examination provided by the department relating to the knowledge of this code and other safety aspects governing the towing of recreational vehicles upon the highway.

(iii) The authority to operate combinations of vehicles under this subparagraph may be granted by endorsement on a class C license upon completion of that written examination.

(G) A vehicle or
 combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating or a gross vehicle weight rating, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (j) and (k), respectively, of Section 15210, of 26,000 pounds or less, if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) Is operated by a farmer, an employee of a farmer, or an instructor credentialed in agriculture as part of an instructional program in agriculture at the high school, community college, or university level.

(ii) Is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations.

(iii) Is not used in the capacity of a for-hire carrier or for compensation.

(H) Firefighting equipment, provided that the equipment is operated by a person who holds a firefighter endorsement pursuant to Section 12804.11.

(I) A motorized scooter.

(J) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,000 pounds or less, except a trailer bus.

(K) Class C does not include a two-wheel motorcycle or a two-wheel motor-driven cycle.

(4) Class M1. A two-wheel motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle. Authority to operate a vehicle included in a class M1 license may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination.

(5) (A) Class M2 includes a motorized bicycle or moped, or a bicycle with an attached motor, except an electric bicycle as described in subdivision (a) of Section 312.5.

(B) Authority to operate vehicles included in class M2 may be granted by endorsement on a class A, B, or C license upon completion of an appropriate examination. Persons holding a class M1 license or endorsement may operate vehicles included in class M2 without further examination.

(c) A driver’s license or driver certificate is not valid for operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, any other motor vehicle
 listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or any other vehicle requiring a driver to hold any driver certificate or any driver’s license endorsement under Section 15275, unless a medical certificate approved by the department that has been issued within two years of the date of the operation of that vehicle and a copy of the medical examination report from which the certificate was issued is on file with the department. Otherwise, the license is valid only for operating class C vehicles that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210, and for operating class M1 or M2 vehicles, if so endorsed, that are not commercial vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.

(d) A license or driver certificate issued before the enactment of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15200) is valid to operate the class or type of vehicles specified under the law in
 existence before that enactment until the license or certificate expires or is otherwise suspended, revoked, or canceled. Upon application for renewal or replacement of a driver’s license, endorsement, or certificate required to operate a commercial motor vehicle, a valid medical certificate on a form approved by the department shall be submitted to the department.

(e) The department may accept a certificate of driving skill that is issued by an employer, authorized by the department to issue a certificate under Section 15250, of the applicant, in lieu of a driving test, on class A or B applications, if the applicant has first qualified for a class C license and has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The certificate may be submitted as evidence of the applicant’s skill in the operation of the types of equipment covered by the license for which the applicant is applying.

(f) The department may accept a certificate of competence in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, when the certificate is issued by a law enforcement agency for its officers who operate class M1 or M2 vehicles in their duties, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying.

(g) The department may accept a certificate of satisfactory completion of a motorcyclist training program approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2932 in lieu of a driving test on class M1 or M2 applications, if the applicant has met the other examination requirements for the license for which the applicant is applying. The department shall review and approve the written and driving test used by a program to determine whether the program may issue a certificate of completion.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a person holding a valid California driver’s license of any class may operate a short-term rental motorized bicycle without taking any special examination for the operation of a motorized bicycle, and without having a class M2 endorsement on that license. As used in this subdivision, “short-term” means 48 hours or less.

(i) A person under 21 years of age shall not be issued a class M1 or M2 license or endorsement unless the person provides evidence satisfactory to the department of completion of a novice motorcycle safety training program that is operated pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(j) A driver of a vanpool vehicle may operate with a class C license but shall possess evidence of a medical examination required for a class B license
 when operating vanpool vehicles. In order to be eligible to drive the vanpool vehicle, the driver shall keep in the vanpool vehicle a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the driver has not been convicted of reckless driving, drunk driving, or a hit-and-run offense in the last five years.

(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 610, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   (SB 128)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    See later operative version amended by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

12804.9.

(a) (1) The examination shall include all of the following:

(A) A test of the applicant’s knowledge and understanding of the provisions of this code governing the operation of vehicles upon the highways.

(B) A test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand simple English used in highway traffic and directional signs.

(C) A test of the applicant’s understanding of traffic signs and signals, including the bikeway signs, markers, and traffic control devices established by the Department of Transportation.

(D) An actual demonstration of the
 applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in operating a motor vehicle by driving it under the supervision of an examining officer. The applicant shall submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive, except that the department may waive the driving test part of the examination for any applicant who submits a license issued by another state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico if the department verifies through any acknowledged national driver record data source that there are no stops, holds, or other impediments to its issuance. The examining officer may request to see evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle before supervising the demonstration of the applicant’s ability to operate the vehicle. The examining officer may refuse to examine an applicant who is unable to provide proof of financial responsibility for the
 vehicle, unless proof of financial responsibility is not required by this code.

(E) A test of the hearing and eyesight of the applicant, and of other matters that may be necessary to determine the mental and physical fitness of the applicant to operate a motor vehicle upon the highways, and whether any grounds exist for refusal of a license under this code.

(2) (A) Before a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, may be issued or renewed, the applicant shall have in the applicant’s driver record a valid report of a medical examination of the applicant given not more than two years before the date of the application by a health care professional. As used in this paragraph, “health care professional” means a person who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with applicable state laws and
 regulations to practice medicine and perform physical examinations in the United States. Health care professionals are doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, physician assistants, and registered advanced practice nurses, or doctors of chiropractic who are clinically competent to perform the medical examination presently required of motor carrier drivers by the United States Department of Transportation. The report shall be on a form approved by the department. In establishing the requirements, consideration may be given to the standards presently required of motor carrier drivers by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.

(B) The department may accept a federal waiver of one or more physical qualification standards if the waiver is accompanied by a report of a nonqualifying medical examination for a class A or class B driver’s license, or class C driver’s license with a commercial endorsement, pursuant to Section 391.41(a)(3)(ii)
 of Subpart E of Part 391 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) A physical defect of the applicant that, in the opinion of the department, is compensated for to ensure safe driving ability, shall not prevent the issuance of a license to the applicant.

(b) In accordance with the following classifications, an applicant for a driver’s license shall be required to submit to an examination appropriate to the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles the applicant desires a license to drive:

(1) Class A includes the following:

(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a combination of vehicles, if a vehicle being towed has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds.

(B) A vehicle towing more than one vehicle.

(C) A trailer bus.

(D) The operation of all vehicles under class B and class C.

(2) Class B includes the following:

(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (3), a single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds.

(B) A single vehicle with three or more axles, except any three-axle vehicle weighing less than 6,000 pounds.

(C) A bus with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds, except a trailer bus.

(D) A farm labor vehicle.

(E) A single vehicle with three or more axles or a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than 26,000 pounds towing another vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less.

(F) A house car over 40 feet in length, excluding safety devices and safety bumpers.

(G) The operation of all vehicles covered under class C.

(3) Class C includes the following:
